District of Columbia statutes.
20-511

Powers and duties of successor personal representative.

A successor personal representative shall have the same powers and duties as the original personal representative including the powers granted in the will but excluding any power that the will expressly made personal to the personal representative named in the will.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-511.